Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.011

Employment of code reviser and staff.

The committee shall employ on behalf of the state and from time to time fix the compensation of a competent code reviser, with power to terminate any such employment at any time. The committee shall also employ on behalf of the state and fix the compensation of such additional legal and clerical assistance to the code reviser as may reasonably be required under this chapter. The committee shall have general supervision and control over the functions and performance of the code reviser.

[ 2005 c 409 s 4; 1951 c 157 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 409: See note following RCW 1.08.001.